en: Immobilizer installation type: 12 V accessory socket plug-in; Adhesive mount; Battery powered (standalone); Bolt-on/clamp-on; Hardwired; No installation (mechanical); OBD-II plug-in; Other
nb: Installasjonstype for kjøretøylås: Plugg for 12 V-kontakt; Selvklebende feste; Batteridrevet (frittstående); Påskrudd/klemfeste; Fastkablet; Ingen installasjon (mekanisk); OBD-II-plugg; Annet
hu: Indításgátló beépítési típusa: 12 V-os szivargyújtó-csatlakozós; Ragasztható; Elemes/akkumulátoros (önálló); Csavarozható/bilincses; Fixre kötött; Nem igényel beszerelést (mechanikus); OBD-II csatlakozós; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt hệ thống chống trộm: Cắm cổng phụ kiện 12V; Gắn bằng keo dán; Chạy bằng pin (độc lập); Bắt ốc/kẹp; Đấu dây trực tiếp; Không cần lắp đặt (cơ học); Cắm cổng OBD-II; Khác
zh-TW: 汽車防盜器安裝類型: 12 V 車用點菸器插頭; 黏貼式安裝; 電池供電 (獨立); 螺栓固定/夾鉗安裝; 硬接線; 免安裝 (機械式); OBD-II 插入式; 其他
es: Tipo de instalación del inmobilizador: Conector de toma de accesorios de 12 V; Montaje adhesivo; Funciona con batería (autónomo); Atornillable/con abrazadera; Cableado; Sin instalación (mecánico); Conector OBD-II; Otro
zh-CN: 防盗止动器安装类型: 12 V 附件插座插入式; 背胶固定; 电池供电 (独立); 螺栓固定/夹持; 硬接线; 免安装 (机械式); OBD-II 插入式; 其他
cs: Způsob montáže imobilizéru: Zapojení do 12V zásuvky; Nalepovací úchyt; Na baterie (samostatné); Na šrouby/svorky; Pevné připojení; Bez instalace (mechanické); Zapojení do OBD-II; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tipul de instalare al imobilizatorului: Conectare la priza de accesorii de 12 V; Montare cu adeziv; Alimentat cu baterie (independent); Fixare cu șuruburi/cleme; Cablat; Fără instalare (mecanic); Plug-in OBD-II; Altele
sv: Installationstyp för startspärr: Instick för 12 V-tillbehörsuttag; Självhäftande fäste; Batteridriven (fristående); Bult-/klämmontering; Hårdkopplad; Ingen installation (mekanisk); OBD-II-instick; Övrigt
ru: Тип установки иммобилайзера: В розетку 12 В (прикуриватель); На клейкую основу; На батарейках (автономный); На болтах/зажимах; Проводное подключение; Без установки (механический); В разъем OBD-II; Другое
fr: Type d'installation de l'antidémarrage: Branchement sur prise accessoire 12 V; Support adhésif; Alimentation par pile (autonome); À boulonner/à pincer; Câblé; Aucune installation (mécanique); Branchement sur prise OBD-II; Autre
da: Installationstype for startspærring: 12 V tilbehørsstik (plug-in); Selvklæbende montering; Batteridrevet (selvstændig); Fastboltet/fastspændt; Fastkablet; Ingen montering (mekanisk); OBD-II-plug-in; Andet
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie imobilizéru: Do 12 V zásuvky; Lepiaci držiak; Na batérie (samostatné); Priskrutkovanie/upnutie; Pevné káblové pripojenie; Bez inštalácie (mechanické); Do portu OBD-II; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve blokade motorja: Vtič za 12-V vtičnico; Pritrditev z lepilom; Baterijsko napajanje (samostojno); Privito/vpeto s sponko; Fiksno ožičenje; Brez namestitve (mehansko); Vtič za OBD-II; Drugo
tr: İmmobilizer montaj tipi: 12 V aksesuar soketi eklentisi; Yapışkanlı montaj; Pille çalışan (bağımsız); Cıvatalı/kelepçeli; Sabit kablolu; Kurulum yok (mekanik); OBD-II eklentisi; Diğer
ja: イモビライザー取り付けタイプ: 12 V アクセサリーソケットプラグイン; 粘着マウント; バッテリー駆動 (スタンドアロン); ボルトオン/クランプオン; 直結配線 (ハードワイヤード); 設置不要 (機械式); OBD-II プラグイン; その他
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на имобилайзер: Включване в 12 V гнездо за запалка; Монтаж със залепване; На батерии (самостоятелен); С болтове/скоби; Твърдо окабеляване; Без монтаж (механичен); Включване в OBD-II; Други
fi: Ajonestolaiteen asennustyyppi: 12 V lisävarustepistoke; Tarrakiinnitys; Akkukäyttöinen (itsenäinen); Pultattava/puristettava; Kiinteästi johdotettu; Ei asennusta (mekaaninen); OBD-II-pistoke; Muu
lt-LT: Imobilizatoriaus įrengimo tipas: 12 V priedų lizdo kištukas; Klijuojamas laikiklis; Maitinamas baterijomis (autonominis); Prisukamas / užspaudžiamas; Nuolat prijungtas; Be montavimo (mechaninis); OBD-II kištukas; Kita
de: Montageart der Wegfahrsperre: 12-V-Steckdose (Plug-in); Klebehalterung; Batteriebetrieben (Standalone); Anschraubbar/Anklemmbar; Festverdrahtet; Keine Installation (mechanisch); OBD-II (Plug-in); Sonstiges
it: Tipo di installazione dell'immobilizzatore: Plug-in per presa accessori da 12 V; Supporto adesivo; Alimentazione a batteria (indipendente); Fissaggio con bulloni/morsetto; Cablato; Nessuna installazione (meccanica); Plug-in OBD-II; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje imobilizatora: Priključak za 12 V utičnicu; Ljepljivi nosač; Na baterije (samostalno); Pričvršćivanje vijcima/stezaljkama; Fiksno ožičeno; Bez instalacije (mehaničko); OBD-II priključak; Ostalo
ko: 도난 방지 장치 설치 유형: 12V 액세서리 소켓 플러그인; 접착식 마운트; 배터리 구동형(독립형); 볼트 온/클램프 온; 하드와이어 방식; 무설치형(기계식); OBD-II 플러그인; 기타
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งระบบอิมโมบิไลเซอร์: ปลั๊กอินช่องเสียบอุปกรณ์เสริม 12V; ติดด้วยกาว; ใช้แบตเตอรี่ (สแตนด์อโลน); ขันนอต/ยึดด้วยแคลมป์; เดินสายไฟแบบถาวร; ไม่ต้องติดตั้ง (แบบกลไก); ปลั๊กอิน OBD-II; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης immobilizer: Σύνδεση σε πρίζα αναπτήρα 12 V; Αυτοκόλλητη βάση; Τροφοδοσία με μπαταρία (αυτόνομο); Βιδωτό/με σφιγκτήρα; Ενσύρματη σύνδεση; Χωρίς εγκατάσταση (μηχανικό); Σύνδεση OBD-II; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do imobilizador: Ligação a tomada de acessórios de 12 V; Suporte adesivo; Alimentação a pilhas (autónomo); Aparafusado/com grampo; Ligação direta; Sem instalação (mecânica); Ligação OBD-II; Outro
pl: Typ instalacji immobilisera: Wtyczka do gniazda 12 V; Montaż na klej; Zasilany bateryjnie (niezależny); Przykręcany/zaciskany; Podłączany na stałe; Brak instalacji (mechaniczny); Podłączany do OBD-II; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de instalação do imobilizador: Plug-in de soquete de acessório 12 V; Suporte adesivo; Alimentado por bateria (autônomo); Parafusado/grampeado; Com fio; Sem instalação (mecânico); Plug-in OBD-II; Outro
nl: Installatietype startonderbreker: 12V-accessoire-aansluiting plug-in; Zelfklevende montage; Op batterijen (standalone); Bout-/klembevestiging; Bedraad; Geen installatie (mechanisch); OBD-II-plug-in; Overig